North Carolina, session 2025, HB591.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "The G.U.A.R.D. Act" or "The
Guaranteeing Uninterrupted Access to Resident Dignity Act."
SECTION 2. Part 1 of Article 6 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 131E-112.10. Electronic monitoring of nursing home and combination home residents.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Electronic monitoring device. – Any technology capable of capturing and
storing audio or video data, or both, including a video surveillance camera, an
audio device, a mobile telephone, or an internet video surveillance device.
(2) Resident. – A person residing in a nursing home or combination home, or that
person's responsible party or legal representative.
(b) A nursing home or combination home shall permit a resident to monitor the resident's
room through the use of an electronic monitoring device. The nursing home or combination home
shall require a resident who exercises this option to post a notice in a conspicuous location on the
door of the resident's room stating that the room is being monitored by an electronic monitoring
device.
(c) All of the following apply to monitoring conducted by a resident under this section:
(1) Electronic monitoring is noncompulsory and at the election of the resident.
*H591-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The resident is responsible for all costs associated with the installation,
maintenance, and removal of the electronic monitoring device.
(3) To the greatest extent possible, the resident shall protect the privacy rights of
other residents and visitors of the nursing home or combination home.
(d) In complying with this section, all of the following apply to nursing homes and
combination homes:
(1) Shall not refuse to admit an individual as a resident of the nursing home or
combination home, nor discharge a resident from a nursing home or
combination home, due to a request to install an electronic monitoring device
in the resident's room.
(2) Shall make reasonable physical accommodations for a resident's electronic
monitoring device by providing access to power sources, access to the internet
if readily available, and a reasonably secure place to mount the electronic
monitoring device.
(3) Shall inform a resident or prospective resident of the resident's right to install
or arrange for the installation of an electronic monitoring device.
(4) May require a resident who requests to install an electronic monitoring device
to make the request in writing.
(5) Shall not include in any contract between a resident and the nursing home or
combination home a provision that purports to waive or modify the resident's
rights under this section.
(e) A recording created through the use of a resident's electronic monitoring device in
either a civil or criminal action brought in a North Carolina court of competent jurisdiction is
admissible, subject to Chapter 8C of the General Statutes.
(f) A person who operates a nursing home or combination home in violation of this
section is guilty of a Class A1 misdemeanor and upon conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding
two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both.
(g) A person who willfully and without the consent of a resident hampers, obstructs,
tampers with, or destroys an electronic monitoring device shall be guilty of a Class A1
misdemeanor and upon conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars
($2,000) or imprisonment not exceeding 90 days, or both."
SECTION 3. G.S. 131E-117 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(17) To install or have installed at the resident's own expense an electronic
monitoring device in the resident's room pursuant to G.S. 131E-112.10 for the
purpose of ensuring the resident's health and safety."
SECTION 4. Article 1 of Chapter 131D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 131D-7.10. Electronic monitoring of adult care home residents.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Electronic monitoring device. – Any technology capable of capturing and
storing audio or video data, or both, including a video surveillance camera, an
audio device, a mobile telephone, or an internet video surveillance device.
(2) Resident. – A person residing in an adult care home or the person's responsible
party or legal representative.
(b) An adult care home shall permit a resident to monitor the resident's room through the
use of an electronic monitoring device. The adult care home shall require a resident who exercises
this option to post a notice in a conspicuous location on the door of the resident's room stating
that the room is being monitored by an electronic monitoring device.
(c) All of the following apply to monitoring conducted by a resident under this section:
(1) Electronic monitoring is noncompulsory and at the election of the resident.
Page 2 House Bill 591-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The resident is responsible for all costs associated with the installation,
maintenance, and removal of the electronic monitoring device.
(3) To the greatest extent possible, the resident shall protect the privacy rights of
other residents and visitors of the adult care home.
(d) In complying with this section, all of the following apply to adult care homes:
(1) Shall not refuse to admit an individual as a resident of an adult care home, nor
discharge a resident from an adult care home, due to a request to install an
electronic monitoring device in the resident's room.
(2) Shall make reasonable physical accommodations for a resident's electronic
monitoring device by providing access to power sources, access to the internet
if readily available, and a reasonably secure place to mount the electronic
monitoring device.
(3) Shall inform a resident or prospective resident of the resident's right to install
or arrange for the installation of an electronic monitoring device.
(4) May require a resident who requests to install an electronic monitoring device
to make the request in writing.
(5) Shall not include in any contract between a resident and the adult care home
a provision that purports to waive or modify the resident's rights under this
section.
(e) A recording created through the use of a resident's electronic monitoring device in
either a civil or criminal action brought in a North Carolina court of competent jurisdiction is
admissible, subject to Chapter 8C of the General Statutes.
(f) A person who operates an adult care home in violation of this section is guilty of a
Class A1 misdemeanor and upon conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding two thousand
dollars ($2,000) or imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both.
(g) A person who willfully and without the consent of a resident hampers, obstructs,
tampers with, or destroys an electronic monitoring device shall be guilty of a Class A1
misdemeanor and upon conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars
($2,000) or imprisonment not exceeding 90 days, or both."
SECTION 5. G.S. 131D-21 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(18) To install or have installed at the resident's own expense an electronic
monitoring device in the resident's room pursuant to G.S. 131D-7.10 for the
purpose of ensuring the resident's health and safety."
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
House Bill 591-First Edition Page 3